Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,640,028 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Board of
Accountancy.
SECTION 2. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by House April 27, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 8, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5001 (HB 5001-A) Page 1